Utah statutes.
41-6a-1002.   Pedestrians' right-of-way -- Duty of pedestrian.

(1) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), when traffic-control signals are not in place or not in operation, the operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way by slowing down or stopping if necessary:

(i)  to a pedestrian crossing the roadway within a crosswalk when the pedestrian is on the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling; or

(ii)  when the pedestrian is approaching so closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in danger. 

(b)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply under conditions of Subsection 41-6a-1003(2).

(c)  A pedestrian may not suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle which is so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.

(2)  The operator of a vehicle approaching a school crosswalk shall come to a complete stop at the school crosswalk if:

(a)  a school speed limit sign has the warning lights operating; and

(b)  the crosswalk is occupied by a person.

(3)  If a vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway, the operator of any other vehicle approaching from the rear may not overtake and pass the stopped vehicle.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

